Utah statutes.
59-10-1006.   Historic preservation tax credit.
(1) (a)  For tax years beginning January 1, 1993, and thereafter, there is
allowed to a claimant, estate, or trust, as a nonrefundable tax credit against
the income tax due, an amount equal to 20% of qualified rehabilitation
expenditures, costing more than $10,000, incurred in connection with any
residential certified historic building.  When qualifying expenditures of more
than $10,000 are incurred, the tax credit allowed by this section shall apply
to the full amount of expenditures.
(b)  All rehabilitation work to which the tax credit may be applied shall be
approved  by the State Historic Preservation Office prior to completion of the
rehabilitation project as meeting the Secretary of the Interior's Standards
for Rehabilitation so that the office can provide corrective comments to the
claimant, estate, or trust in order to preserve the historical qualities of
the building.
(c)  Any amount of tax credit remaining may be carried forward to each of the
five taxable years following the qualified expenditures.
(d)  The commission, in consultation with the Division of State History, shall
promulgate rules to implement this section.
(2)  As used in this section:
(a)  "Certified historic building" means a building that is listed on the
National Register of Historic Places within three years of taking the credit
under this section or that is located in a National Register Historic District
and the building has been designated by the Division of State History as being
of significance to the district.
(b) (i)  "Qualified rehabilitation expenditures" means any amount properly
chargeable to the rehabilitation and restoration of the physical elements of
the building, including the historic decorative elements, and the upgrading of
the structural, mechanical, electrical, and plumbing systems to applicable
codes.
(ii)  "Qualified rehabilitation expenditures" does not include expenditures
related to:
(A)  a claimant's, estate's, or trust's personal labor;
(B)  cost of acquisition of the property;
(C)  any expenditure attributable to the enlargement of an existing building;
(D)  rehabilitation of a certified historic building without the approval
required in Subsection (1)(b); or
(E)  any expenditure attributable to landscaping and other site features,
outbuildings, garages, and related features.
(c)  "Residential" means a building used for residential use, either owner
occupied or income producing.
